Hawaii statutes.
§196-23 Energy efficient products.
(a) Agencies shall select, when life-cycle cost-effective, ENERGY STAR and
other energy efficient products when acquiring energy‑using products.
For product groups where ENERGY STAR labels are not yet available, agencies may
select products that are in the upper twenty-five per cent of energy efficiency
as designated by the United States Department of Energy, Office of Energy
Efficiency and Renewable Energy, federal energy management program.

(b) Agencies shall incorporate energy‑efficient
criteria consistent with designated energy‑efficiency levels into product
specification language developed for all purchasing procedures.

(c) The State shall consider the creation of
financing agreements with private sector suppliers to provide private funding
to offset higher up-front costs of efficient products.

(d) Agencies entering into leases, including
the renegotiation or extension of existing leases, shall:

(1) Incorporate lease provisions that encourage
energy and water efficiency wherever life-cycle cost-effective. Build-to-suit
lease solicitations shall contain criteria encouraging sustainable design and
development, energy efficiency, and verification of facility performance;

(2) Include a preference for facilities having an
ENERGY STAR building label in their selection criteria for acquiring leased
facilities; and

(3) Encourage lessors to apply for an ENERGY STAR
building label and to explore and implement projects that will reduce costs to
the State, including projects carried out through the lessors' energy-savings
contracts. [L 2002, c 77, pt of §9; am L 2006, c 96, §9]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next